New York, session 2025-2026, S8428.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Troop- 4 er James M. MacLarnon. All that portion of the state highway system 5 constituting the southbound Wantagh State Parkway overpass crossing the 6 Southern State Parkway in the town of Hempstead, county of Nassau, shall 7 be dedicated to Trooper James M. MacLarnon. 8 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 9 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 10 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 11 signing shall state "Bridge Dedicated to Trooper James M MacLarnon". 12 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 13 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 14 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such bridge 15 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08433-03-5